Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Convention Bureaus

§ 17-3-21.
Authorization to establish.

Any county or municipality or any group composed of a county or counties and a municipality or municipalities located in a county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico, may by resolution spread upon the minutes of each participating governing body establish a convention bureau for the purpose of promoting the convention and tourist business in such counties or municipalities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-3-23.
Convention bureau boards.

In the event a convention bureau or bureaus are established hereunder, there shall be a convention bureau board which shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the governing authorities of each participating county or municipality. All of the members of said boards shall serve at the discretion of their respective appointing authority. Vacancies which shall occur shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-3-25.
Bonds of board members.

Before entering on the duties of the office, each appointed member of a convention bureau board shall enter into and give bond to be approved by the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi in an amount not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned on the satisfactory performance of his duties. Such bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi and in the event of a breach thereof, suit may be brought by the State of Mississippi for the benefit of the affected convention bureau. The premiums on said bonds shall be paid from funds received by the board under provisions of Sections 17-3-21 through 17-3-31.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 17-3-27.
Board meetings and organization.

When a convention bureau has been established and the members of the board have been appointed and qualified as set forth herein, they shall, not more than thirty (30) days thereafter, hold an organizational meeting after giving not less than ten (10) days’ notice of the time and place of such meeting by registered mail, postage prepaid, directed to each appointed member of such board at his regular address given to the Secretary of State immediately upon his qualification. Such notice shall be given by the appointing authority for the original organization of such convention bureau. Any county or municipality thereafter desiring to participate shall make appointments, and the members shall qualify in the same manner prescribed for the original board members. Upon being duly qualified, such new appointees, shall be given notice by the board as to the time, date and place of the next succeeding meeting, including a copy of any bylaws, rules or regulations and a summary of the actions taken by the board. At any meeting a quorum shall consist of a majority of the board. The board shall elect a president and secretary, both of whom shall be members of said board, and shall adopt such rules and regulations as may govern the time and place for holding subsequent meetings, regular and special, and other rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of Sections 17-3-21 through 17-3-31. The election of the president and secretary shall be made annually thereafter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-3-29.
Powers of convention bureaus.

A convention bureau established hereunder shall have the authority to promote tourism and convention business. In this regard, the commission is empowered:

To own, lease or contract for any equipment useful and necessary in the promotion of tourism and convention business;

To receive and expend revenues from any sources;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets, subject to the prior approval of a majority of the appointing authority;

To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in real or personal property or enter any interest therein wherever situated, subject to the prior approval of the appointing authorities; and

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any and all of the purposes for which the board is organized, and further, to appoint and employ agencies acting in its behalf for any or all of the aforementioned powers and responsibilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-3-31.
Special tax levy.

Each participating governing body may annually levy a special tax, not to exceed one-quarter (1/4) mill ad valorem tax, upon all taxable property located within its respective jurisdiction; the avails of such special levy to be used exclusively for the operations and activities of the convention bureau established herein. Such levy shall not be reimbursable under any homestead exemption law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 493, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 17-3-33.
Certain local convention bureaus, tourism commissions and similar entities required to contract with private certified public accounting firm for annual audit.

Any convention bureau, local tourism commission or similar entity established under this chapter or any other law of the State of Mississippi, including any local and private law of the State of Mississippi, which receives funds from any special tax or levy imposed for the support of such bureau, commission or similar entity, shall annually hire a private certified public accounting firm to complete an audit of the revenues and expenditures of the bureau, commission or similar entity and its compliance with state law. A copy of the annual audit shall be provided to the State Department of Audit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 339, § 2, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2005.